Louisiana, session 2026, SB191.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 47:2153(C)(1)(a), 2201(B), 2207(A) and (E), and 2266.1(A)(1) are
hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§2153. Notice of delinquency; tax lien holder; tax lien auction
* * *
C.(1)(a) At the expiration of twenty days' notice, counting from the day
when the last of the written notices are sent, or as soon thereafter as practicable, the
tax collector shall proceed to publish a notice of the delinquency and to advertise for
auction the consolidated delinquent tax list under one form two times within thirty
days in the official journal of the political subdivision. The publication and
advertisement shall be sufficient if it is in the following form:
"DELINQUENT TAX AND STATUTORY IMPOSITION LIST
______________________________ vs. Delinquent Tax Debtors
(insert appropriate taxing bodies)
By virtue of the authority vested in me by the constitution and the laws of the
state of Louisiana, I will sell by public auction, at ____________________,
beginning at __________ o'clock a.m. on __________, the __________ day of
Page 1 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 191 ENROLLED
__________, ____, and continuing on each succeeding legal day, until the auction
is completed, the tax lien. I will issue in favor of the winning bidder and record in
the mortgage records a tax lien certificate to all immovable property on which taxes
are now due to ___________________________, to enforce collection of taxes
(insert affected taxing bodies) assessed in the year ____, together with interest
thereon from January 1, ____, at a rate not to exceed one percent (1%) per month on
a noncompounding basis until paid and all costs. The names of the delinquent tax
debtors, the amount of statutory impositions due, including any due for prior years,
and the immovable property assessed to each for which a tax lien certificate will be
issued are as follows: (Insert names of delinquent tax debtors in alphabetical order,
the amount of statutory impositions due, including any due for prior years on each
specific piece of property, and the description of each specific piece of immovable
property for which a tax lien certificate will be issued.)
At the auction, I will sell the tax lien to the winning bidder. The sale will be
for cash or other payment method acceptable to the tax collector, in legal tender
money of the United States.
At any time prior to the institution of an action to enforce the tax lien, the tax
lien may be extinguished by paying the price paid at auction together with interest
at the rate established at the tax lien auction which shall not exceed one percent (1%)
per month on a noncompounding basis computed on the amount paid at auction by
the tax lien certificate purchaser until terminated, a penalty at the rate of five percent
(5%), and costs reimbursable pursuant to R.S. 47:2156. The termination payment
shall also include the amount of any subsequent parish and municipal statutory
impositions paid by the tax lien certificate holder, together with the applicable five
percent (5%) penalty and any applicable interest computed on the statutory
impositions at a rate of one percent (1%) per month on a noncompounding basis."
* * *
§2201. Ordinance; sale or donation of adjudicated property; sale of tax lien held by
a political subdivision; issuance of a tax lien certificate for
adjudicated property; sale of immovable property to enforce a tax
Page 2 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 191 ENROLLED
lien held by a political subdivision
* * *
B. A political subdivision may adopt ordinances which convert tax sale title
to adjudicated property held by the political subdivision to a tax lien certificate
issued to in favor of the political subdivision. The political subdivision shall file a
tax lien certificate with the recorder of mortgages for the parish in which the
property is located. For purposes of Subsection C of this Section and R.S.
47:2266.1(A), adjudicated property may be converted to a tax lien certificate
property, and the period of adjudication may be included in the three-year period
required for the tax lien certificate. If the conversion occurs ordinance is adopted
more than three years after three years from the recordation of the adjudication
with the recorder of conveyances of the parish in which the property is located, the
property may be sold after compliance with the post-tax lien notice requirements in
R.S. 47:2156 enforcement of the tax lien may commence immediately after
recordation of the tax lien certificate and satisfaction of any other requirements
imposed by the provisions of this Subpart and the ordinance.
* * *
§2207. Sale Act of sale or donation; of adjudicated property; sale of immovable
property to enforce a tax lien held by a political subdivision;
authentication recordation; form
A.(1) Following the sale or donation of adjudicated property, at any time after
the expiration of the sixty-day or six-month periods, as applicable, set forth in R.S.
47:2206(A) and, if applicable, upon the satisfaction of any terms or conditions
required in the ordinance authorizing the sale or donation, the acquiring person
transferee of the property, or his successors and assigns, may send to the political
subdivision a written notice requesting that the political subdivision authenticate the
execute an act of sale or donation. The political subdivision shall authenticate
execute the act of sale or donation within ten days from the date of the request or as
soon thereafter as practicable.
(2) Immediately following the public sale of immovable property to enforce
Page 3 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 191 ENROLLED
a tax lien held by a political subdivision and, if applicable, upon the satisfaction of
any terms or conditions imposed by the ordinance authorizing the public sale, the
political subdivision shall execute in favor of the winning bidder an act of sale.
Except as otherwise provided in R.S. 47:2268(B), the sale shall operate to terminate
all interests in the immovable property.
(3) A transferee of immovable property in accordance with this Subpart shall
be responsible for filing file the act of sale or donation and for recordation in the
conveyance records of the parish in which the property is located and shall be
responsible for the payment of all filing fees. The only warranty owed by the
political subdivision shall be a warranty against eviction resulting from a prior
alienation by the political subdivision. Otherwise, all sales and donations shall be
without warranty, either expressed or implied, even as to return or reduction of the
purchase price, including without limitation the warranty against redhibitory defects
or vices and the warranty that the thing sold is reasonably fit for its ordinary purpose
or the transferee's intended or particular purpose. These waivers or exclusions of
warranties shall be self-operative regardless of whether the waivers or exclusions are
contained in the act of sale or donation, and regardless of whether they are clear and
unambiguous, and regardless of whether they are brought to the attention of the
transferee. This provision supersedes the requirements of any other law.
* * *
E. A certified copy of the act of sale or donation shall be prima facie
evidence of the regularity of all matters dealing with the sale or donation and the
validity of the sale or donation as reflected in the information contained therein.
* * *
§2266.1. Procedure to recognize amounts due under tax lien certificate
A.(1) Upon the expiration of the later of either the expiration of three years
from recordation of the tax lien certificate, or the tax sale certificate if R.S.
47:2201(B) is applicable, or the expiration of six months after providing the notices
required by from compliance with the notice requirements of R.S. 47:2156, a
certificate holder may, by verified petition, institute in a court of competent
Page 4 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 191 ENROLLED
jurisdiction, as determined by the value of the immovable property described and not
by the value of the delinquent obligation, an ordinary proceeding seeking recognition
of the delinquent obligation and the lien and privilege evidenced by the tax lien
certificate. The petition shall name as a defendant each owner of the property shown
in the conveyance records.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 47:2207 as amended and reenacted by Section 2 of Act No. 411 of
the 2025 Regular Session of the Legislature of Louisiana is hereby repealed.
Section 3. During the 2025 Regular Session of the Legislature of Louisiana, Sections
1 and 2 of Act No. 411 amended and reenacted R.S. 47:2207. It is the intent of the
Legislature that R.S. 47:2207 as amended and reenacted by Section 1 of Act No. 411 shall
control. The Louisiana State Law Institute is hereby directed to print the provisions of R.S.
47:2207 as they appear in Section 1 of Act No. 411 as amended by this Act and no longer
print those provisions as they appear in Section 2 of Act No. 411.
Section 4. The provisions of R.S. 47:2153 as amended by Section 1 of this Act shall
apply to tax lien auctions occurring on or after January 1, 2027.
Section 5. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 5 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.